Florida, session 2026, HB649.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsections (1) through (5) of section
624.315, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (2)
through (6), respectively, a new subsection (1) is added to that
section, paragraph (p) is added to present subsection (2) of
that section, and paragraph (c) of present subsection (1) and
present subsection (5) of that section are amended, to read:
624.315 Annual reports; quarterly reports.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Financial strength rating" means an objective
evaluation of the assets, liabilities, net worth, financial
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb649-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 649 2026
health, performance, and risk of a property insurer as
determined by an independent rating agency.
(b) "Independent rating agency" means an entity that meets
all of the following requirements:
1. Issues unbiased and objective financial strength
ratings of insurers without the consent of the insurer.
2. Is not paid for ratings by the rated insurers, directly
or indirectly, whether in cash or other forms of payment.
3. Does not permit any rated insurer to influence the
ratings of that insurer.
4. Is independent and free from outside control or
influence and can issue ratings objectively, without fear of
reprisals or loss of business.
5. May begin, suspend, or end rating an insurer at its
discretion.
6. Is not owned or controlled, in whole or in part, by any
insurer and does not enter into or maintain any potentially
related business relationships with rated insurers.
(2)(1) As early as reasonably possible, the office, with
such assistance from the department as requested, shall annually
prepare a report to the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House
of Representatives, the President and Minority Leader of the
Senate, the chairs of the legislative committees with
jurisdiction over matters of insurance, and the Governor
showing, with respect to the preceding calendar year:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb649-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 649 2026
(c) Names of insurers against which delinquency or similar
proceedings were instituted. For property insurers for which the
delinquency or similar proceedings were instituted, the annual
report must also include the date that each insurer was deemed
impaired of capital or surplus, as the terms impairment of
capital and impairment of surplus are defined in s. 631.011, or
insolvent, as the term insolvency is defined in s. 631.011; the
financial strength ratings of the insurer issued by an
independent rating agency for each of the previous 8 fiscal
quarters before the delinquency or similar proceedings; a
concise statement of the circumstances that led to each
insurer's delinquency; a summary of the actions taken by the
insurer and the office to avoid delinquency; and the results or
status of each such proceeding.
(3)(2) The office shall maintain the following information
and make such information available upon request:
(p) The financial strength rating issued to each property
insurer by an independent rating agency each calendar quarter
during the reporting period, including the changes in ratings
from quarter to quarter, the number of downgrades in ratings
which occurred during the reporting period, the number of
downgraded companies that were subsequently upgraded during the
reporting period, and the number of downgraded companies that
were subject to delinquency or similar proceedings.
(6)(5) When aggregate information includes information
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb649-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 649 2026
asserted as trade secret information, the office may include the
trade secret information in the report required under subsection
(2) (1) or may make the trade secret information available under
subsection (3) (2) unless the trade secret information can be
individually extrapolated, in which case the trade secret
information remains protected as provided under s. 624.4213.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb649-00